Illinois, session 104th, HB5692.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated for the 7objects and purposes hereinafter named, to meet the ordinary 8and contingent expenses of the Property Tax Appeal Board:9Payable from the Personal Property  10 Tax Replacement Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................6,595,90012  For Contributions to the State13   Employees' Retirement System.....................2,866,30014  For State Contributions to15   Social Security....................................504,60016  For Group Insurance...............................2,288,00017  For Contractual Services............................725,00018  For Travel...........................................39,00019  For Commodities......................................12,50020  For Printing..........................................5,50021  For Equipment.........................................5,80022  For Electronic Data Processing......................336,00023  For Telecommunication Services.......................45,500  HB5692- 2 -OMB104 00268 CMV 10268 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................9,1002  For Refunds.............................................2003  For Costs Associated with the Appeal4   Process and Office Relocation......................400,0005    Total                                         $13,833,400 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.